Hawaii, session 2025, SB1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that H5 avian influenza viruses, also referred to as bird flu, include the H5N1 subtype of bird flu virus that has spread globally in birds since its initial discovery in 1996 and recently has been detected in several mammal species.  Bird flu can cause severe illness with a high mortality rate among certain bird populations, such as poultry, and can cross between species and infect dairy cows. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), as of January 20, 2025, bird flu has been detected in every state, with nine hundred twenty-eight dairy herds and 136,327,394 poultry having been affected.  In November 2024, the H5N1 bird flu virus was first confirmed in Hawaii in a backyard flock of birds in central Oahu.  H5 has since been detected through wastewater testing in Hilo and on Kauai. The legislature also finds that as of January 20, 2025, the CDC reported sixty-seven confirmed human cases of bird flu. Nearly all the cases occurred in farm workers.  While symptoms are typically mild, one case did result in death.  No human-to-human transmission has been reported, and the current risk to the public is considered low.  However, close monitoring is warranted to identify any change in the virus that may increase transmissibility or infection severity. Enhanced biosecurity will help protect local farms and food production, and increased testing of birds will help better understand the spread of bird flu in Hawaii.  In addition, education will help inform the public about bird flu, their risk, and how to stay safe. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of health and department of agriculture to prevent, monitor, and respond to avian influenza in Hawaii. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to carry out the purposes of this Act, including to prevent, monitor, and respond to avian influenza in the State. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to carry out the purposes of this Act, including to prevent, monitor, and respond to avian influenza in the State. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________